Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-836
School board; additional sanctions authorized; when.

(1) After providing the opportunity for a hearing on cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal as provided for in sections 79-828, 79-829, and 79-832, and except when reduction in force is the reason given for possible termination, and when just cause can be shown, the school board may impose such other sanctions, other than termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of the contract, as may be agreed upon by the parties.

(2) The fact that action has been taken under this section in the past may be taken into consideration in determining appropriate action in future hearings with regard to the certificated employee for a period of five years following the date of such action.

Laws 1982, LB 259, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,118;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 466.

Reduction-in-force policy, see sections 79-846 to 79-849.